pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Camping i chodzenie po górach > Przenośne toalety i prysznice > Przenośne toalety i pisuary > Pisuary męskie: Cewniki zewnętrzne; Jednorazowe worki na mocz; Przenośne kaczki sanitarne
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Camping, vandring och backpacking > Portabla toaletter och duschar > Portabla toaletter och urinbehållare > Urinbehållare för män: Uridomer; Engångsurinpåsar; Bärbara urinflaskor
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Κατασκήνωση & πεζοπορία > Φορητές τουαλέτες & ντους > Φορητές τουαλέτες & συσκευές ούρησης > Συσκευές ούρησης ανδρών: Περιπεϊκοί καθετήρες; Σακούλες ούρησης μιας χρήσης; Φορητά δοχεία ούρησης
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Camping și drumeții > Toalete și dușuri portabile > Toalete portabile și dispozitive pentru urinat > Dispozitive pentru urinat pentru bărbați: Catetere tip prezervativ; Pungi de unică folosință pentru urină; Sticle portabile pentru urină
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Cắm trại & Đi bộ đường dài > Nhà vệ sinh và phòng tắm di động > Thiết bị vệ sinh cá nhân cầm tay > Thiết bị đi tiểu cho nam: Bao cao su tiểu nam di động; Túi tiểu dùng một lần; Bình tiểu di động
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Kempovanie a turistika > Prenosné toalety a sprchy > Prenosné toalety a zariadenia na močenie > Zariadenia na močenie pre mužov: Katétre do kondómov; Jednorazové vrecká na moč; Prenosné fľaše na moč
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Kampiranje in pohodništvo > Prenosna stranišča in prhe > Prenosna stranišča in naprave za uriniranje > Naprave za uriniranje za moške: Kondomski urinski katetri; Vrečke za enkratno uporabo za uriniranje; Prenosni pisoarji
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Kampiranje i planinarenje > Prijenosni zahodi i tuševi > Prijenosni zahodi i uređaji za mokrenje > Muški uređaji za mokrenje: Kateteri za kondome; Vrećice za jednokratnu upotrebu za urinale; Boce za prijenosne urinale
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Kempování a turistika > Přenosné toalety a sprchy > Přenosné toalety a pisoáry > Zařízení na močení pro muže: Kondomové katétry; Jednorázové pisoárové sáčky; Přenosné pisoárové lahve
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Campismo e caminhada > Chuveiros e sanitas portáteis > Sanitas portáteis e dispositivos para urinação > Dispositivos de urinação masculinos: Cateteres tipo preservativo; Sacos de urinol descartáveis; Garrafas de urinol portáteis
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Kampçılık ve Doğa Yürüyüşü > Taşınabilir Tuvaletler ve Duşlar > Taşınabilir Tuvaletler ve İdrar Çıkarma Cihazları > Erkek İdrar Tuvaleti Cihazları: Prezervatif sondalar; Tek kullanımlık idrar torbaları; Taşınabilir pisuvar şişeleri
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 露營和健行 > 流動浴廁 > 流動廁所/小便斗裝置 > 男性站尿用具: 保險套導尿管; 拋棄式尿袋; 攜帶式尿壺
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Кемпинги и походы > Походные души и туалеты > Походные туалеты и писсуары > Портативные мужские писсуары: Уропрезервативы; Одноразовые пакеты для сбора мочи; Портативные писсуары
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Camping og fjellvandring > Portable toaletter og dusjer > Portable toaletter og urineringsapparater > Mannlige vannlatingsenheter: Urindomer; Engangsurinposer; Bærbare urinflasker
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > キャンプ ・ハイキング > 携帯トイレ・シャワー > 携帯トイレ > 男性用携帯トイレ: コンドームカテーテル; 使い捨て尿袋; 携帯用尿瓶
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Къмпинг и туризъм > Преносими тоалетни и душове > Преносими тоалетни и устройства за уриниране > Мъжки устройства за уриниране: Външни уринарни катетри; Торбички за уриниране за еднократна употреба; Преносими бутилки за уриниране
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > การตั้งแคมป์และเดินเขา > ห้องน้ำและที่อาบน้ำเคลื่อนที่ > อุปกรณ์ห้องน้ำและโถส้วมเคลื่อนที่ > อุปกรณ์โถส้วมสำหรับบุรุษ: สายสวนปัสสาวะภายนอกเพศชาย; ถุงปัสสาวะใช้แล้วทิ้ง; ขวดปัสสาวะพกพา
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Camping og vandreture > Flytbare toiletter og brusere > Flytbare toiletter og enheder til vandladning > Vandladningsanordninger til mænd: Uridomer; Engangsurinposer; Bærbare urinflasker
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Stovyklavimas ir žygiai > Nešiojamieji tualetai ir dušai > Nešiojamieji tualetai ir pisuarai > Vyriški pisuarai: Neinvaziniai šlapimo surinkimo kateteriai; Vienkartiniai pisuarų maišeliai; Nešiojamieji pisuarai
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Retkeily ja vaellus > Kannettavat WC:t ja suihkut > Kannettavat WC:t ja virtsasuppilot > Miesten virtsaamislaitteet: Kondomikatetrit; Kertakäyttöiset virtsapussit; Kannettavat virtsapullot
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Acampamento e caminhada > Chuveiros e banheiros portáteis > Banheiros portáteis > Dispositivos para urinar masculino: Cateteres externos masculinos; Sacos de urinol descartáveis; Garrafas de mictório portáteis
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 野营与远足 > 移动厕所/淋浴房 > 移动马桶/小便器 > 男性小便器: 尿套; 一次性尿袋; 便携式尿壶
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Kemping és túrázás > Hordozható WC-k és zuhanyzók > Hordozható WC-k és vizeletürítő eszközök > Férfi vizeletürítő készülékek: Kondomkatéterek; Egyszer használatos vizeletgyűjtő tasakok; Hordozható vizeletgyűjtő palackok
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Kamperen en wandelen > Mobiele wc's en douches > Mobiele wc's en urinoirs > Urineerapparaten voor mannen: Condoomkatheters; Wegwerp-urinezakken; Draagbare urineflessen
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Camping & Wandern > Mobile Toiletten & Duschen > Mobile Toiletten & Urinale > Männerurinale: Kondomurinale; Einweg-Urinbeutel; Tragbare Urinflaschen
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Camping et randonnée > Toilettes et douches mobiles > Toilettes et dispositifs urinaires mobiles > Appareils urinaires masculins: Étuis péniens; Sacs d’urinoir jetables; Bouteilles d’urinoir portables
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Camping & Hiking > Portable Toilets & Showers > Portable Toilets & Urination Devices > Male Urination Devices: Condom Catheters; Disposable Urinal Bags; Portable Urinal Bottles
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Camping y senderismo > Duchas y retretes portátiles > Urinarios y retretes portátiles > Dispositivos para la micción masculina: Catéteres tipo condón; Bolsas urinarias desechables; Botellas urinarias portátiles
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Campeggio e trekking > Docce e toilette portatili > Bagni da campeggio e orinatoi portatili > Dispositivi per la minzione maschile: Cateteri a preservativo; Sacche orinatoio usa e getta; Pappagalli orinatoi portatili
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 캠핑/하이킹 > 휴대용 변기/샤워기 > 휴대용 변기/소변기 > 남성용 소변기: 콘돔 카테터; 일회용 소변 봉투; 휴대용 소변통